Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 16.2 Quasi Public Corporations — Longevity

36-16.2-1.
Longevity payments — Quasi public employees.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for employees of the quasi-public corporations; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011, or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the last pay period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

For purposes of this section “quasi-public corporation” means a body corporate and politic acting as a public corporation, which has been organized pursuant to law and granted certain powers, rights and privileges by the general laws, while exhibiting a distinct legal existence from the state, and not constituting a department of the state government, in order to perform a governmental function.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 6.